Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4728.03
Commission; special advisory committee; members.

The commission shall implement section 71-4728.02 with the advice of a special advisory committee appointed by the commission. The committee shall consist of five members as follows: Three counselors familiar with mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse disorders in deaf or hard of hearing persons and two human services professionals. The Department of Health and Human Services and the commission shall each have a representative who serves on the committee in a nonvoting technical capacity.

Laws 1995, LB 25, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 682;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 21.